Hawaii statutes.
[§40-86] Lapse of University of Hawaii
appropriations. Upon the lapse of an appropriation to the University of
Hawaii, moneys which remain unencumbered shall be returned to the state
treasury within ninety days. [L 1986, c 321, §2]

Note

Repeal of section by L 1986, c 321, §12 as amended by L 1987,
c 283, §69; L 1989, c 371, §7; L 1991, c 163, §3; L 1993, c 314, §2; L Sp 1993,
c 8, §22; L 1997, c 180, §1; L 1998, c 115, §24; and L 2005, c 137, §1 deleted
by L 2006, c 161, §7.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next